Utah statutes.
13-12-6.   Distributor electing not to continue doing business in state -- Repurchase merchandise.

If a distributor elects to discontinue doing business in the state of Utah during the term of a marketing agreement with the dealer, the distributor shall repurchase merchandise in salable condition at a fair wholesale market value not to exceed original invoice price which the dealer has purchased from the distributor.

